Nebraska, session 109, LB608.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 44-314, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
44-314 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an
employer providing for an individual or family health insurance policy for a
first responder employee shall not cancel such policy if the first responder
suffers serious bodily injury from an event that occurs while the first
responder is acting in the line of duty and that results in the first responder
falling below the minimum number of working hours needed to maintain his or her
regular individual or family health insurance.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit an employer from
canceling such policy if the first responder:
(a) Voluntarily ceases to be employed with the employer; or
(b) Does not return to employment within twelve months after the date of
injury.
(3) For a first responder who dies as a result of an event that occurs
while the first responder is acting in the line of duty, the employer of such
first responder shall not cancel any health insurance policy covering a spouse
or dependent of such first responder for a period of at least twelve months
following such death.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Employer means any state or local governmental entity that employs a
first responder;
(b) First responder means any law enforcement officer, professional
firefighter, or paid individual licensed under a licensure classification in
subdivision (1) of section 38-1217 who provides medical care in order to
prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological illness
or injury;
(c) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section 81-1401;
(d) Line of duty means any action that a first responder is authorized or
obligated by law, rule, or regulation to perform, related to or as a condition
of employment or service; and
(e) Professional firefighter means an individual who is a firefighter or
firefighter-paramedic as a full-time career and who is a member of a paid fire
department of any of the following entities within Nebraska:
(i) A municipality, including a municipality having a home rule charter or
a municipal authority created pursuant to a home rule charter that has its own
paid fire department;
(ii) A rural or suburban fire protection district; or
(iii) A fire service providing fire protection to federal or state
military installations.
Sec. 2. Section 85-2601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2601 Sections 2 to 18 of this act 85-2601 to 85-2608 shall be known and
may be cited as the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.
Sec. 3. Section 85-2602, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2602 For purposes of the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act:
(1) Associate degree program means a degree program at a community
college, state college, or state university which typically requires completion
of an organized program of study of at least sixty semester credit hours or an
equivalent that can be shown to accomplish the same goal. Associate degree
program does not include a baccalaureate degree program;
(2) Baccalaureate degree program means a degree program at a community
college, state college, or state university which typically requires completion
of an organized program of study of at least one hundred twenty semester credit
hours or an equivalent that can be shown to accomplish the same goal;
(3) Community college means a public postsecondary educational institution
which is part of the community college system and includes all branches and
-1-

LB608 LB608
2025 2025
campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;
(4) Correctional officer means an individual who is employed full-time by
a jail or by the Department of Correctional Services and who is responsible for
the supervision, safety, and security of an adult correctional facility's
population through daily direct contact and interactions with incarcerated
individuals;
(5) Eligible disabled person means an individual who was employed as a
first responder but who, due to injury or illness that resulted from or is
connected to such employment, is no longer able to maintain employment as a
first responder;
(6) First responder means a law enforcement officer, professional
firefighter, correctional officer, or youth detention officer;
(7) (4) Law enforcement officer means any individual who is a law
enforcement officer as defined in section 81-1401;
(8) (5) Legal dependent has the same meaning as it is used for purposes of
the Free Application for Federal Student Aid;
(9) (6) Line of duty means any action that a first responder law
enforcement officer or professional firefighter is authorized or obligated by
law, rule, or regulation to perform, related to or as a condition of employment
or service;
(10) (7) Professional firefighter means an individual who is a firefighter
or firefighter-paramedic as a full-time career and who is a member of a paid
fire department of any of the following entities within Nebraska:
(a) A municipality, including a municipality having a home rule charter or
a municipal authority created pursuant to a home rule charter that has its own
paid fire department;
(b) A rural or suburban fire protection district; or
(c) A fire service providing fire protection to federal or state military
installations;
(11) Qualifying child means:
(a) A legal dependent; or
(b) A person who is a nondependent child of a first responder or an
eligible disabled person and who is a legal dependent of another parent. To be
considered a qualifying child under this subdivision, the maternity or
paternity of the child shall be verified through a birth certificate or other
means approved by the admission or financial aid office of the state
university, state college, or community college;
(12) Qualifying degree means:
(a) For a law enforcement officer, a degree that relates to a career in
law enforcement;
(b) For a professional firefighter, a degree that relates to a career in
professional firefighting; and
(c) For a correctional officer or youth detention officer, a degree that
relates to a career in corrections, youth detention, or law enforcement;
(13) (8) State college means a public postsecondary educational
institution which is part of the Nebraska state college system and includes all
branches and campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;
(14) (9) State university means a public postsecondary educational
institution which is part of the University of Nebraska and includes all
branches and campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;
and
(15) Superior officer means:
(a) For a law enforcement officer, such officer's superior law enforcement
officer;
(b) For a professional firefighter, the fire chief of such professional
firefighter's fire department; and
(c) For a correctional officer or youth detention officer, such officer's
superior;
(16) (10) Tuition means the charges and cost of tuition as set by the
governing body of a state university, state college, or community college;
and .
(17) Youth detention officer means an individual who is employed full-time
by a juvenile detention facility, as defined in section 83-4,125, and who is
responsible for the secure detention and treatment of a juvenile detention
facility's population through daily direct contact and interactions with
detained juveniles.
Sec. 4. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a first
responder shall be entitled to a tuition waiver as provided in section 13 of
this act from any state university, state college, or community college for an
associate or baccalaureate degree program if the first responder:
(a) Satisfies the relevant requirements of section 5 of this act;
(b) Meets all admission requirements of the state university, state
college, or community college;
(c) Pursues studies leading to a qualifying degree from an associate
degree program or a baccalaureate degree program;
(d) Submits the certificate of verification required by subsection (2) of
this section; and
(e) Files with the Department of Revenue documentation showing proof of
employment as a first responder and proof of residence in Nebraska each year
such first responder applies for and receives the tuition waiver.
(2) An application for the tuition waiver shall include a certificate of
verification from the first responder's superior officer attesting to such
first responder's satisfaction of section 5 of this act. The first responder
-2-

LB608 LB608
2025 2025
shall include the certificate of verification when applying to the state
university, state college, or community college in order to obtain tuition
waiver upon initial enrollment.
(3) For a first responder who is a correctional officer or a youth
detention officer, the tuition waiver shall only be available beginning July 1,
2027, and shall only be available for attendance at a state university.
Sec. 5. In order for a first responder or a first responder's qualifying
child to be eligible to receive a tuition waiver under section 13 of this act,
the first responder must meet the following criteria:
(1) If the first responder is a law enforcement officer, such officer must
possess a law enforcement officer certificate under sections 81-1401 to
81-1414.19. This subdivision shall not be satisfied if the Nebraska Police
Standards Advisory Council has revoked or suspended such certificate or limited
certificate under subdivision (6) of section 81-1403 and the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice has reviewed and approved
such revocation or suspension;
(2) If the first responder is a firefighter, such firefighter must
maintain satisfactory performance with such firefighter's fire department;
(3) If the first responder is a correctional officer, such officer must
maintain satisfactory performance as a correctional officer; or
(4) If the first responder is a youth detention officer, such officer must
maintain satisfactory performance as a youth detention officer.
Sec. 6. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an
eligible disabled person shall be entitled to a tuition waiver as provided in
section 13 of this act from any state university, state college, or community
college for an associate or baccalaureate degree program if such person:
(a) Satisfies the relevant requirements of section 7 of this act;
(b) Meets all admission requirements of the state university, state
college, or community college;
(c) Submits the certificate of verification required by subsection (2) of
this section; and
(d) Files with the Department of Revenue documentation showing proof of
status as an eligible disabled person and proof of residence in Nebraska each
year such person applies for and receives the tuition waiver.
(2) An application for the tuition waiver shall include a certificate of
verification from the applicant's former superior officer attesting to such
applicant's satisfaction of section 7 of this act. The applicant shall include
the certificate of verification when applying to the state university, state
college, or community college in order to obtain tuition waiver upon initial
enrollment.
(3) For an eligible disabled person who was a correctional officer or a
youth detention officer, the tuition waiver shall only be available beginning
July 1, 2027, and shall only be available for attendance at a state university.
Sec. 7. In order for an eligible disabled person or such person's
qualifying child to be eligible to receive a tuition waiver under the First
Responder Recruitment and Retention Act, the eligible disabled person must meet
the following criteria:
(1) If the eligible disabled person was a law enforcement officer, such
person possessed, at the time of becoming disabled, a law enforcement officer
certificate under sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19. This subdivision shall not be
satisfied if the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council has revoked or
suspended such certificate or limited certificate under subdivision (6) of
section 81-1403 and the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice has reviewed and approved such revocation or suspension;
(2) If the eligible disabled person was a firefighter, such person
maintained, at the time of becoming disabled, satisfactory performance with
such firefighter's fire department;
(3) If the eligible disabled person was a correctional officer, such
person maintained, at the time of becoming disabled, satisfactory performance
as a correctional officer; or
(4) If the eligible disabled person was a youth detention officer, such
person maintained, at the time of becoming disabled, satisfactory performance
as a youth detention officer.
Sec. 8. A first responder or an eligible disabled person may receive a
tuition waiver for up to five years if he or she otherwise continues to be
eligible for participation under sections 4 to 7 of this act.
Sec. 9. (1) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, a qualifying child of a first responder who satisfies section 5 of
this act or of an eligible disabled person who satisfies section 7 of this act
shall be entitled to a tuition waiver as provided in section 13 of this act
from any state university, state college, or community college for an associate
or baccalaureate degree program if the qualifying child:
(a) Meets all admission requirements of the state university, state
college, or community college;
(b) Executes an agreement in accordance with section 10 of this act;
(c) Has not previously earned a baccalaureate degree;
(d) Completes and submits to the United States Department of Education a
Free Application for Federal Student Aid;
(e) Submits a document to the state university, state college, or
community college confirming that the qualifying child has satisfied
subdivision (1)(d) of this section. Such document shall be submitted in a form
and manner as prescribed by the university, college, or community college;
(f) Submits the certificate of verification required by subsection (2) of
-3-

LB608 LB608
2025 2025
this section; and
(g) Files with the Department of Revenue documentation showing proof that,
for each year in which the qualifying child applies for and receives the
tuition waiver, the first responder or eligible disabled person through whom
the qualifying child is claiming the tuition waiver:
(i) Is employed as a first responder or is an eligible disabled person, as
applicable; and
(ii) Resides in Nebraska.
(2)(a) An application for the tuition waiver shall include a certificate
of verification from:
(i) The first responder's superior officer attesting to such first
responder's satisfaction of section 5 of this act; or
(ii) The eligible disabled person's former superior officer attesting to
such person's satisfaction of section 7 of this act.
(b) The applicant shall include the certificate of verification when
applying to the state university, state college, or community college in order
to obtain a tuition waiver upon initial enrollment.
(3) The death of a first responder in the line of duty that occurs after
submission of an application for a tuition waiver shall not disqualify such
first responder's otherwise eligible qualifying child from receiving the
tuition waiver. In such case:
(a) In lieu of submitting the certificate of verification provided for in
subsection (2) of this section, the qualifying child shall submit a certificate
of verification from the first responder's superior officer attesting that:
(i) At the time of such death, such first responder satisfied section 5 of
this act; and
(ii) Such first responder died in the line of duty; and
(b) In lieu of making the filing required by subdivision (1)(g) of this
section, the qualifying child shall file with the Department of Revenue
documentation showing proof that, at the time of such death:
(i) Such first responder was employed as a first responder; and
(ii) Such first responder resided in Nebraska.
(4) For a qualifying child of a first responder who is a correctional
officer or a youth detention officer or of an eligible disabled person who was
a correctional officer or a youth detention officer, the tuition waiver shall
only be available beginning July 1, 2027, and shall only be available for
attendance at a state university.
Sec. 10. Section 85-2605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2605 (1) Each qualifying child legal dependent who is a tuition waiver
recipient under the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act shall execute
an agreement. Such agreement shall be exempt from the requirements of the State
Procurement Act and shall include the following terms, as appropriate:
(a) The tuition waiver recipient agrees to reside within the State of
Nebraska for a period of five years following the use of the tuition waiver;
(b) Each year during the five-year period following use of the tuition
waiver the tuition waiver recipient agrees to file a tax return with the
Department of Revenue to document that such recipient still resides in the
State of Nebraska;
(c) If the tuition waiver recipient fails to annually file a tax return to
prove residency in the State of Nebraska for the five-year period following the
use of the tuition waiver or fails to remain a resident of Nebraska for the
five-year period following the use of the tuition waiver, the tuition waiver
recipient agrees to repay the community college, state college, or state
university that such tuition waiver recipient attended the amount of tuition
that was waived for such individual if the community college, state college, or
state university requests such payment on the dates and in the amounts
requested; and
(d) Any residency, filing, or payment obligation incurred by the tuition
waiver recipient under the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act is
canceled in the event of the tuition waiver recipient's total and permanent
disability or death.
(2) The five-year residency requirement begins to run after use of the
first tuition waiver and:
(a) Completion of the five-year tuition waiver eligibility;
(b) Completion of an undergraduate degree at a state college or state
university;
(c) Completion of a two-year degree at a community college and
notification by the tuition waiver recipient to the Department of Revenue that
such recipient does not intend to pursue an undergraduate degree or additional
two-year degree using tuition waivers pursuant to the First Responder
Recruitment and Retention Act; or
(d) Notification by the tuition waiver recipient to the Department of
Revenue that such recipient does not plan to use additional tuition waivers
pursuant to the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.
Sec. 11. A qualifying child may receive the tuition waiver under section
9 of this act for up to five years if the qualifying child continues to be
eligible for participation. The five years of tuition waiver eligibility starts
once the qualifying child applies for and receives the tuition waiver for the
first time and is available to such qualifying child for the next consecutive
five years.
Sec. 12. Within forty-five days after receipt of a completed application
under section 4, 6, or 9 of this act, the state university, state college, or
-4-

LB608 LB608
2025 2025
community college shall send written notice of the applicant's eligibility or
ineligibility for the tuition waiver. If the applicant is determined not to be
eligible for the tuition waiver, the notice shall include the reason or reasons
for such determination.
Sec. 13. A state university, state college, or community college that has
granted a tuition waiver under the First Responder Recruitment and Retention
Act shall waive one hundred percent of resident tuition charges remaining due
after subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and state scholarships
and grants for the tuition waiver recipient during the time the recipient is
enrolled. To remain eligible, such recipient must comply with all requirements
of the institution for continued attendance and award of an associate degree or
a baccalaureate degree.
Sec. 14. (1) Beginning July 1, 2028, subject to available appropriations,
the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education shall reimburse each
state university for fifty percent of the tuition waivers for correctional
officers, youth detention officers, eligible disabled persons that were
formerly correctional officers and youth detention officers, and the qualifying
children of such officers and persons granted in the preceding year by such
state university.
(2) A state university shall request reimbursement by submitting
documentation in a form and manner prescribed by the commission.
(3) If state appropriations are not sufficient to satisfy all of the
claims filed during any year, then the commission shall prorate each state
university's total reimbursement for that year in proportion to the remaining
appropriation. Any reimbursement claims paid on a prorated basis shall not be
refiled.
Sec. 15. Section 85-2604, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2604 Each state university, state college, or community college shall
adopt and promulgate the procedures, rules, and regulations necessary to carry
out the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.
Sec. 16. Section 85-2606, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2606 The Department of Revenue shall administer and enforce the First
Responder Recruitment and Retention Act and may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.
Sec. 17. Section 85-2607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2607 On or before December 31 of each year, each state university,
state college, and community college shall provide to the Department of Revenue
a list of the qualifying children legal dependents who received a tuition
waiver pursuant to the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act during
such year.
Sec. 18. Section 85-2608, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
85-2608 (1) The Department of Revenue shall maintain a record of the
qualifying children legal dependents who have received tuition waivers pursuant
to the First Responder Recruitment and Retention Act.
(2) On or before each August 1, the department shall provide a report to
each state university, state college, and community college indicating which
tuition waiver recipients have failed to file a tax return with the department
to document that such recipients still resided in the State of Nebraska during
the preceding year.
Sec. 19. Original sections 85-2601, 85-2602, 85-2604, 85-2605, 85-2606,
85-2607, and 85-2608, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 44-314,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 20. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 85-2603
and 85-2603.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-5-